West Virginia, session 2025, SB146.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS. §18-3-6. Interpretation of school laws and rules of State Board of Education. At the request in writing of any citizen, teacher, school official, county or state officer, the State Superintendent of Schools shall give his or her interpretation of the meaning of any part of the school law or of the rules of the State Board of Education. Except when a state or federal court of competent jurisdiction has already rendered a contrary interpretation of the meaning of part of school law or rules of the State Board of Education, the county boards of education, county superintendents, employees of the county boards of education, and the West Virginia Public Employees' Grievance Board shall give substantial deference to the State Superintendent's interpretation of that part of the school law or rules of the State Board of Education.Note:  The purpose of this bill is to require entities and parties to uphold and apply the Superintendent of Schools’ interpretation of school law and State Board of Education rules.Strike-throughs indicate language that would be stricken from a heading or the present law and underscoring indicates new language that would be added. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home